Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Procedure for Exercise of Dissenters' Rights

§ 17-16-1320.
Notice of appraisal rights.

If proposed corporate action described in W.S.

17-16-1302

is to be submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, the meeting notice shall state that corporation has concluded that shareholders are, are not or may be entitled to assert appraisal rights under this article. If the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available, a copy of this article shall accompany the meeting notice sent to those record shareholders entitled to exercise appraisal rights.

In a merger pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1105

, the parent corporation shall notify in writing all record shareholders of the subsidiary who are entitled to assert appraisal rights that the corporate action became effective. The notice shall be sent within ten (10) days after the corporate action became effective and include the materials described in W.S.

17-16-1322

.

Where any corporate action specified in W.S. 17-16-1302(a) is to be approved by written consent of the shareholders pursuant to W.S.

17-16-704

:

Written notice that appraisal rights are, are not or may be available shall be given to each record shareholder from whom a consent is solicited at the time consent of such shareholder is first solicited and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, shall be accompanied by a copy of this article; and

Written notice that appraisal rights are, are not or may be available shall be delivered together with the notice to nonconsenting and nonvoting shareholders required by W.S.

17-16-704

(e) and (f), may include the materials described in W.S.

17-16-1322

and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, shall be accompanied by a copy of this article.

Where corporate action described in W.S. 17-16-1302(a) is proposed, or a merger pursuant to W.S

17-16-1105

is effected, the notice referred to in subsection (a) or (c) of this section, if the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available, and in subsection (b) of this section shall be accompanied by:

The annual financial statements specified in W.S. 17-16-1620(a) of the corporation that issued the shares that may be subject to appraisal, which shall be as of a date ending not more than sixteen (16) months before the date of the notice and shall comply with W.S. 17-16-1620(b); provided that, if the annual financial statements are not reasonably available, the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information; and

The latest available quarterly financial statements of such corporation, if any.

The right to receive the information described in subsection (d) of this section may be waived in writing by a shareholder before or after the corporate action.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the section, which read: “(a) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under W.S.

17-16-1302

is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, the meeting notice shall state that shareholders are or may be entitled to assert dissenters' rights under this article and be accompanied by a copy of this article.

“(b) If corporate action creating dissenters' rights under W.S.

17-16-1302

is taken without a vote of shareholders, the corporation shall notify in writing all shareholders entitled to assert dissenters' rights that the action was taken and send them the dissenters' notice described in W.S.

17-16-1322

.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Timeliness and sufficiency of dissenting shareholder's notice of his objection to consolidation or merger and of his demand for payment for his shares, 40 ALR3d 260.

Causation in private civil actions by minority shareholders under proxy provisions of § 14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USCS § 78n(a)) and Securities Exchange Act (SEC) Rules thereunder — post Virginia Bankshares, 137 ALR Fed 293.

§ 17-16-1321.
Notice of intent to demand payment and consequences of voting or consenting.

If proposed corporate action requiring appraisal under W.S.

17-16-1302

is submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares:

Shall deliver to the corporation before the vote is taken written notice of the shareholder’s intent to demand payment if the proposed action is effectuated; and

Shall not vote or cause or permit to be voted any shares of the class or series in favor of the proposed action.

If a corporate action specified in W.S. 17-16-1302(a) is to be approved by written consent, a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares shall not execute a consent in favor of the proposed action with respect to that class or series of shares.

A shareholder who does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) or (b) of this section is not entitled to payment for his shares under this article.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a), which read: “If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under W.S.

17-16-1302

is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters' rights shall deliver to the corporation before the vote is taken written notice of his intent to demand payment for his shares if the proposed action is effectuated and shall not vote his shares in favor of the proposed action.”; added “or (c)” in (b); added (c); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1322.
Appraisal notice and form.

If corporate action requiring appraisal under W.S. 17-16-1302(a) becomes effective, the corporation shall deliver a written appraisal notice to all shareholders who satisfied the requirements of W.S. 17-16-1321(a) or (b). In the case of a merger under W.S.

17-16-1105

, the parent shall deliver a written appraisal notice and form to all record shareholders who may be entitled to assert appraisal rights.

The appraisal notice shall be sent no later than ten (10) days after the corporate action specified in W.S. 17-16-1302(a) became effective, and shall:

Supply a form that:

Specifies the first date of any announcement to shareholders made prior to the date the corporate action became effective of the principal terms of the proposed corporate action; and

If such announcement was made, requires that the shareholder asserting appraisal rights certify whether beneficial ownership of the shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired before that date; and

Requires the shareholder asserting appraisal rights to certify that such shareholder did not vote for or consent to the transaction.

State:

Where the form shall be sent and where certificates for certificated shares shall be deposited and the date by which those certificates shall be deposited, which date may not be earlier than the date for receiving the required form under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph;

Date by which the corporation shall receive the form, which date may not be fewer than forty (40) nor more than sixty (60) days after the date the appraisal notice and form are sent pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, and state that the shareholder shall have waived the right to demand appraisal with respect to the shares unless the form is received by the corporation by such specified date;

The corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares;

That, if requested in writing, the corporation will provide, to the shareholder so requesting, within ten (10) days after the date specified in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph the number of shareholders who return the forms by the specified date and the total number of shares owned by them; and

The date by which the notice to withdraw under W.S.

17-16-1323

must be received, which date shall be within twenty (20) days after the date specified in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.

Be accompanied by a copy of this article.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the former section, which read: “(a) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under W.S.

17-16-1302

is authorized at a shareholders' meeting, the corporation shall deliver a written dissenters' notice to all shareholders who satisfied the requirements of W.S.

17-16-1321

.

“(b) The dissenters' notice shall be sent no later than ten (10) days after the corporate action was taken, and shall:

“(i) State where the payment demand shall be sent and where and when certificates for certificated shares shall be deposited;

“(ii) Inform holders of uncertificated shares to what extent transfer of the shares will be restricted after the payment demand is received;

“(iii) Supply a form for demanding payment that includes the date of the first announcement to news media or to shareholders of the terms of the proposed corporate action and requires that the person asserting dissenters' rights certify whether or not he acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before that date;

“(iv) Set a date by which the corporation shall receive the payment demand, which date may not be fewer than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) days after the date the notice required by subsection (a) of this section is delivered; and

“(v) Be accompanied by a copy of this article.”

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1323.
Perfection of rights; right to withdraw.

A shareholder who receives notice pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1322

and who wishes to exercise appraisal rights shall sign and return the form sent by the corporation and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit his certificates in accordance with the terms of the notice by the date referred to in the notice pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1322

(b)(ii)(B). In addition, if applicable, the shareholder shall certify on the form whether the beneficial owner of such shares acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the notice pursuant to W.S. 17-16-1322(b)(i). If a shareholder fails to make this certification, the corporation may elect to treat the shareholder’s shares as after acquired shares under W.S.

17-16-1324

. Once a shareholder deposits that shareholder’s certificates or, in the case of uncertificated shares, returns the signed forms, that shareholder loses all rights as a shareholder, unless the shareholder withdraws pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

The shareholder who has complied with subsection (a) of this section may nevertheless decline to exercise appraisal rights and withdraw from the appraisal process by so notifying the corporation in writing by the date set forth in the appraisal notice pursuant to W.S. 17-16-1322(b)(ii)(E). A shareholder who fails to so withdraw from the appraisal process may not thereafter withdraw without the corporation’s written consent.

A shareholder who does not sign and return the form and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit his share certificates where required, each by the date set forth in the notice described in W.S. 17-16-1322(b), is not entitled to payment under this article.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the former section, which read: “(a) A shareholder sent a dissenters' notice described in W.S.

17-16-1322

shall demand payment, certify whether he acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the dissenters' notice pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1322

(b)(iii), and deposit his certificates in accordance with the terms of the notice.

“(b) The shareholder who demands payment and deposits his share certificates under subsection (a) of this section retains all other rights of a shareholder until these rights are cancelled or modified by the taking of the proposed corporate action.

“(c) A shareholder who does not demand payment or deposit his share certificates where required, each by the date set in the dissenters' notice, is not entitled to payment for his shares under this article.”

§ 17-16-1324.
Payment.

Except as provided in W.S.

17-16-1325

, within one hundred twenty (120) days after the form required by W.S. 17-16-1322(b)(ii)(B) is due, the corporation shall pay in cash or other agreed upon consideration to those shareholders who complied with W.S.

17-16-1323

the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of his shares, plus interest.

The payment to each shareholder pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be accompanied by:

The annual financial statements specified in W.S. 17-16-1620(a) of the corporation that issued the shares to be appraised, which shall be of a date ending not more than sixteen (16) months before the date of payment and shall comply with W.S. 17-16-1620(b), provided that if such annual financial statements are not reasonably available, the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information. The corporation shall also provide the latest available quarterly financial statements, if any;

A statement of the corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares which estimate shall equal or exceed the corporation’s estimate given pursuant to W.S. 17-16-1322(b)(ii)(C);

A statement that shareholders described in subsection (a) of this section have the right to demand further payment under W.S.

17-16-1326

and that if any shareholder does not do so within the time period specified therein, the shareholder shall be deemed to have accepted such payment in full satisfaction of the corporation’s obligations under this article.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the former section, which read: “(a) Except as provided in W.S. 17-16-1327, as soon as the proposed corporate action is taken, or upon receipt of a payment demand, the corporation shall pay each dissenter who complied with W.S.

17-16-1323

the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of his shares, plus accrued interest.

“(b)
The payment shall be accompanied by:

“(i) The corporation's balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than sixteen (16) months before the date of payment, an income statement for that year, a statement of changes in shareholders' equity for that year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any;

“(ii) A statement of the corporation's estimate of the fair value of the shares;

“(iii) An explanation of how the interest was calculated;

“(iv) A statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under W.S. 17-16-1328; and

“(v) A copy of this article.”

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Valuation of stock of dissenting stockholders in case of sale of corporation's entire assets, 48 ALR3d 430.

Propriety of applying minority discount to value of shares purchased by corporation or its shareholders from minority shareholders, 13 ALR5th 840.

§ 17-16-1325.
After-acquired shares.

A corporation may elect to withhold payment required by W.S.

17-16-1324

from any shareholder who was required to, but did not certify that beneficial ownership of all of the shareholder’s shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired before the date set forth in the appraisal notice sent pursuant to W.S. 17-16-1322(b)(i).

If the corporation elected to withhold payment under subsection (a) of this section, it shall, within thirty (30) days after the form required by W.S. 17-16-1322(b)(ii)(B) is due, notify all shareholders described in subsection (a) of this section:

Of the information required by W.S. 17-16-1324(b)(i);

Of the corporation’s estimate of fair value pursuant to W.S. 17-16-1324(b)(ii);

That they may accept the corporation’s estimate of fair value, plus interest, in full satisfaction of their demands or demand appraisal under W.S.

17-16-1326

;

That those shareholders who wish to accept the offer shall so notify the corporation of their acceptance of the corporation’s offer within thirty (30) days after receiving the offer; and

That those shareholders who do not satisfy the requirements for demanding appraisal under W.S.

17-16-1326

shall be deemed to have accepted the corporation’s offer.

Within ten (10) days after receiving the shareholder’s acceptance pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the corporation shall pay in cash or other agreed upon consideration the amount it offered under paragraph (b)(ii) of this section to each shareholder who agreed to accept the corporation’s offer in full satisfaction of the shareholder’s demand.

Within one hundred thirty (130) days after sending the notice described in subsection (b) of this section, the corporation shall pay in cash the amount it offered to pay under paragraph (b)(ii) of this section to each shareholder described in paragraph (b)(v) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the former section, which read: “(a) A corporation may elect to withhold payment required by W.S.

17-16-1325

from a dissenter unless he was the beneficial owner of the shares before the date set forth in the dissenters' notice as the date of the first announcement to news media or to shareholders of the terms of the proposed corporate action.

“(b) To the extent the corporation elects to withhold payment under subsection (a) of this section, after taking the proposed corporate action, it shall estimate the fair value of the shares, plus accrued interest, and shall pay this amount to each dissenter who agrees to accept it in full satisfaction of his demand. The corporation shall send with its offer a statement of its estimate of the fair value of the shares, an explanation of how the interest was calculated, and a statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under W.S. 17-16-1328.”

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1326.
Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or offer.

A shareholder paid pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1324

who is dissatisfied with the amount of the payment may notify the corporation in writing of that shareholder’s estimate of the fair value of his shares and demand payment of his estimate plus interest, less any payment under W.S.

17-16-1324

. A shareholder offered payment under W.S.

17-16-1325

who is dissatisfied with that offer shall reject the offer and demand payment of the shareholder’s stated estimate of the fair value of the shares plus interest.

A shareholder who fails to notify the corporation in writing of that shareholder’s demand to be paid the shareholder’s stated estimate of the fair value plus interest under subsection (a) of this section within thirty (30) days after receiving the corporation’s payment or offer of payment under W.S.

17-16-1324

or

17-16-1325

, respectively, waives the right to demand payment under this section and shall be entitled only to the payment made or offered pursuant to those respective sections.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the former section, which read: “(a) A dissenter may notify the corporation in writing of his own estimate of the fair value of his shares and amount of interest due, and demand payment of his estimate, less any payment under W.S.

17-16-1325

, or reject the corporation's offer under W.S. 17-16-1327 and demand payment of the fair value of his shares and interest due, if:

“(i) The dissenter believes that the amount paid under W.S.

17-16-1325

or offered under W.S. 17-16-1327 is less than the fair value of his shares or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated;

“(ii) The corporation fails to make payment under W.S.

17-16-1325

within sixty (60) days after the date set for demanding payment; or

“(iii) The corporation, having failed to take the proposed action, does not return the deposited certificates or release the transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares within sixty (60) days after the date set for demanding payment.

“(b) A dissenter waives his right to demand payment under this section unless he notifies the corporation of his demand in writing under subsection (a) of this section within thirty (30) days after the corporation made or offered payment for his shares.”

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.